South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3795.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-101-50 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-101-50. (A) The colleges and other institutions of learning of this State supported in whole or in part by the State shall receive as students those applicants residing within the State in preference to those residing without; provided, however,  that the applications of those residing within the State shall be filed with the president or secretary of such college or institution of learning at least thirty days before the opening of such college or institution. (B) After July 1, 2026 public institutions of higher learning in this State shall ensure that at least seventy percent of the applicants it accepts for admission each school year are domiciled within the State at the time of enrollment as required for students eligible for in-state tuition and fees under Section 59-112-20. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----